Oklahoma, session 2025, SB94.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13001 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. There is hereby created the Oklahoma Commission on Race and


Equality. The Commission shall be appointed as follows:


1. Three members shall be appointed by the Governor;


2. Three members shall be appointed by the President Pro


Tempore of the Senate;


3. Three members shall be appointed by the Speaker of the House


of Representatives; and



Req. No. 1262 Page 1


4. Four members shall be appointed by the Oklahoma Legislative


Black Caucus.


B. All members shall be appointed by the appropriate appointing


authority for a term of three (3) years commencing upon the date


that the previous appointee’s term expired. Each member shall serve


no more than three (3) terms. Each member shall only serve two (2)


consecutive terms and shall be inactive for a period of one (1) year


prior to serving the maximum three-term limit.


C. In making such appointments, consideration shall be given to


making the membership broadly representative of the geographic areas


of this state and the racial and ethnic groups residing in this


state.


D. Each member shall hold office until the successor of the


member is appointed and has qualified. A member appointed to fill a


vacancy occurring before the expiration of a term of a member


removed from the Commission for any cause shall be appointed for the


remainder of the term of the member whose office has been vacated.


E. A member of the Commission may be removed by the appropriate


appointing authority for cause.


F. Members of the Commission shall receive no salary but shall


be entitled to travel reimbursement as provided by the State Travel


Reimbursement Act from funds available to the appropriate appointing


authority.



Req. No. 1262 Page 2


G. The Office of Management and Enterprise Services shall


provide staff support to the Oklahoma Commission on Race and


Equality and make arrangements for a suitable meeting space for the


Commission as needed.


H. The initial chair shall be appointed by the Oklahoma


Legislative Black Caucus, with the approval of the Governor,


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and Speaker of the House of


Representatives. After the initial chair’s first term ends, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate shall name the chair of the


Oklahoma Commission on Race and Equality, and the Speaker of the


House of Representatives shall name the vice chair. Any other


officers deemed necessary shall be elected from among the members at


the first meeting of the Commission. Thereafter, at the first


meeting of each fiscal year, the Commission shall elect a chair, a


vice chair, and such other officers deemed necessary to conduct the


business of the Commission from among its members. A majority of


the members shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting


the business of the Commission. The Commission shall meet at least


once every three (3) months and at such other times as called by the


chair or by a majority of the Commission.


I. The Oklahoma Commission on Race and Equality shall have the


power and duty to:


1. Advise on equality issues relating to racial discrimination


and bias, state agencies and employees, communities, organizations,

Req. No. 1262 Page 3


and businesses of this state which desire the service of the


Commission;


2. Monitor legislation to determine whether legislation is


discriminatory toward one race or ethnicity or whether the race or


ethnicity of an individual would have an effect on the enforcement


of the legislation;


3. Act as a resource and a clearinghouse for research on issues


related to racial discrimination and bias;


4. Act as a resource in any state appointments to commissions


and boards for diversity;


5. Conduct meetings and seminars within the state as


appropriate to support the goals and duties of the Commission; and


6. Electronically submit an annual report to the Governor, the


President Pro Tempore of the Senate, and the Speaker of the House of


Representatives on its activities. The report may include


recommendations concerning needed legislation or regulatory change


relating to racial discrimination and bias.


SECTION 2. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 13002 of Title 74, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund


for the Office of Management and Enterprise Services to be


designated the “Oklahoma Commission on Race and Equality Revolving


Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal

Req. No. 1262 Page 4


year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the


Office of Management and Enterprise Services from all gifts and


donations provided for the purpose of supporting the work of the


Oklahoma Commission on Race and Equality. All monies accruing to


the credit of the fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted


and expended by the Director of the Office of Management and


Enterprise Services on behalf of the Oklahoma Commission on Race and


Equality for the purpose provided for in this section. Expenditures


from the fund shall be made upon warrants issued by the State


Treasurer against claims filed as prescribed by law with the


Director of the Office of Management and Enterprise Services for


approval and payment.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1262 RD 1/19/2025 5:46:23 AM



















Req. No. 1262 Page 5